Washington statutes.
RCW 18.22.060

Examination—Date, location, and application—Reexamination.

(1) The date and location of the examination shall be established by the board. Applicants who have met the requirements for examination under RCW 18.22.040 will be scheduled for the next examination after the filing of the complete application. The board shall establish by rule the examination application deadline.

(2) An applicant who fails to pass an examination satisfactorily is entitled to reexamination upon the payment of a fee for each reexamination determined by the secretary as provided in RCW 43.70.250.

[ 1990 c 147 s 9; 1985 c 7 s 11; 1982 c 21 s 7; 1975 1st ex.s. c 30 s 16; 1973 c 77 s 6; 1965 c 97 s 1; 1957 c 52 s 14. Prior: (i) 1921 c 120 s 5; 1917 c 38 s 9; RRS s 10082. (ii) 1921 c 120 s 4; 1917 c 38 s 7; RRS s 10080.]